Mississippi, session 2026, SB2772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 25-9-131, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 25-9-131.  (1)  Any employee in the state service may appeal his dismissal or other action adversely affecting his employment status to the Employee Appeals Board created herein. The proceedings before the Employee Appeals Board shall be de novo, and the employee shall be afforded all applicable safeguards of procedural due process.  The Employee Appeals Board shall have the authority to administer oaths and affirmations and to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records or other documentary evidence upon a showing of relevancy or materiality of the witnesses or documents to an appeal pending before the board.  Subpoenas so issued shall be delivered to the sheriff of the county where they are to be executed, and the sheriff shall cause them to be served.  In case of the failure of any person to comply with any subpoena issued by the board, the board or its authorized representative may invoke the aid of any court of this state of general jurisdiction.  The court may thereupon order such person to comply with the requirements of the subpoena.  Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.  The Employee Appeals Board may modify the action of the department, agency or institution but may not increase the severity of such action on the employee.  Such appointing authority shall promptly comply with the order issued as a result of the appeal to the Employee Appeals Board. (2)  Any employee aggrieved by a final decision of the Employee Appeals Board shall be entitled to judicial review thereof in the manner provided by law. (3)  It is the intent of Sections 25-9-127 through 25-9-131 to supercede and replace any existing statutory procedure conflicting in whole or in part which provides for the discharge of state employees in any state agency. (4)  (a)  Supplemental to any powers conferred to it by law, the Employee Appeals Board shall be empowered to establish an Independent Review Panel to hear grievable personnel actions of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. The panel shall be charged with ensuring the fairness, transparency, and consistency of actions taken by the Mississippi Department of Corrections. (b)  The Independent Review Panel shall consist of five (5) persons appointed by the Employee Appeals Board to serve at the board's will and pleasure.  There shall at all times be at least one (1) member of the board who is a former Department of Corrections employee, one (1) human resource professional not correctly associated with the Department of Corrections, and one (1) attorney. (c)  The board may transfer any appeal from a decision of the Mississippi Department of Corrections that adversely affects an MDOC employee for resolution.  Decisions of the Independent Review Panel may be appealed to the Employee Appeals Board. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.